Massachusetts, session 194th, S2446.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 22F of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 60, the word “four” and inserting in place thereof the following word:-
“five”.
SECTION 2. Section 22F of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further amended
by striking out, in lines 69-72, the following sentence:-
“An appeal to the superior court may be had, in accordance with the provisions of chapter
thirty A, from any order of the registrar of motor vehicles made under the provisions of this
section.”
SECTION 3. Section 22F of said chapter 90 is hereby further amended by inserting at the
end thereof the following paragraph:-
of 4

“Any person previously deemed an habitual offender under this section who has not had
their license or right to operate a motor vehicle restored to them by the registrar for a period of
more than 5 years and who is convicted of operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or narcotic drugs in violation of paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of section
24; operating a motor vehicle recklessly or negligently so that the lives and safety of the public
might be endangered; making a false statement in an application for a learner’s permit or motor
vehicle operator’s license or in an application for a registration of a motor vehicle; going away
without making known his name, residence and the registration number of his vehicle after
knowingly colliding with or otherwise causing injury to any person, other vehicle or property, all
in violation of paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 24; operating a motor vehicle after
suspension or revocation of the person’s motor vehicle operator’s license or his right to operate
motor vehicles in violation of section 23; operating a motor vehicle without a license in violation
of section 10; or the commission of any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is
used, shall be deemed a level 3 habitual traffic offender and the registrar shall immediately
revoke such person’s license or right to operate and shall not issue a new license or reinstate the
right to operate for a period up to life but not less than 5 years from the date of revocation, nor
until such person has satisfactorily completed a driver improvement course approved by the
registrar and has passed such examination as to his competence to operate motor vehicles as the
registrar may require.
Any person previously deemed an habitual offender under this section who has not had
their license or right to operate a motor vehicle restored to them by the registrar for a period of
more than 5 years and who is convicted of 3 or more convictions of offenses which are required
by any provision of law to be reported to the registrar and for which the registrar is authorized or
of 4

required to suspend or revoke the person’s license or right to operate motor vehicles for a period
of 30 days or more, shall be deemed a level 2 habitual offender and the registrar shall
immediately revoke such person’s license or right to operate and shall not issue a new license or
reinstate the right to operate to such person for a period of not less than 5 years from the date of
revocation nor more than 15 years from such date of revocation, nor until such person has
satisfactorily completed a driver improvement course approved by the registrar and has passed
such examination as to his competence to operate motor vehicles as the registrar may require.
Provided further, that any person previously deemed a level 2 habitual offender under this
section who has not had their license or right to operate a motor vehicle restored to them by the
registrar for a period of 5 years and is convicted of operating a motor vehicle while under the
influence of intoxicating liquor or narcotic drugs in violation of paragraph (a) of subdivision (1)
of section 24; operating a motor vehicle recklessly or negligently so that the lives and safety of
the public might be endangered; making a false statement in an application for a learner’s permit
or motor vehicle operator’s license or in an application for a registration of a motor vehicle;
going away without making known his name, residence and the registration number of his
vehicle after knowingly colliding with or otherwise causing injury to any person, other vehicle or
property, all in violation of paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 24; operating a motor
vehicle after suspension or revocation of the person’s motor vehicle operator’s license or his
right to operate motor vehicles in violation of section 23; operating a motor vehicle without a
license in violation of section 10; or the commission of any felony in the commission of which a
motor vehicle is used; or 2 or more convictions of offenses which are required by any provision
of law to be reported to the registrar and for which the registrar is authorized or required to
suspend or revoke the person’s license or right to operate motor vehicles for a period of 30 days
of 4

or more, shall be deemed a level 3 habitual offender and the registrar shall immediately revoke
such person’s license or right to operate and shall not issue a new license or reinstate the right to
operate for a period up to life but not less than 5 years from the date of revocation, nor until such
person has satisfactorily completed a driver improvement course approved by the registrar and
has passed such examination as to his competence to operate motor vehicles as the registrar may
require. The registrar may revoke from any level 3 habitual offender who has had their license or
right to operate restored and who commits an automobile law violation, as defined in section 1 of
chapter 90C, the license or right to operate for a period up to life. The registrar may further issue
to any habitual traffic offender who has satisfied the durational license revocation requirements
provided for in this section a new license or reinstate such person’s right to operate under such
terms and conditions as the registrar deems appropriate and necessary. Nothing in this section
shall limit the authority of the registrar to revoke a license or right to operate or issue a new
license or reinstate the right to operate under section 24 of chapter 90. An appeal to the superior
court may be had, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 30A, from any order of the
registrar of motor vehicles made under the provisions of this section.”
of 4